Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska9-633
Manufacturer-distributor; resident agent; when required.

Each manufacturer-distributor selling lottery equipment or supplies in this state that is not a resident of this state or is not a corporation shall designate a natural person who is a resident of and living in this state and is nineteen years of age or older as a resident agent for the purpose of receipt and acceptance of service of process and other communications on behalf of the manufacturer-distributor. The name, business address where service of process and delivery of mail can be made, and home address of such agent shall be filed with the department.

Laws 1989, LB 767, § 73.